Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.091

Placement—Secure facility—Treatment and rights—Custody—Reports.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) If the secretary determines in writing that a person committed to the custody of the secretary for treatment as criminally insane presents an unreasonable safety risk which, based on behavior, clinical history, and facility security is not manageable in a state hospital setting, and the secretary has given consideration to reasonable alternatives that would be effective to manage the behavior, the secretary may place the person in any secure facility operated by the secretary or the secretary of the department of corrections. The secretary's written decision and reasoning must be documented in the patient's medical file. Any person affected by this provision shall receive appropriate mental health treatment governed by a formalized treatment plan targeted at mental health rehabilitation needs and shall be afforded his or her rights under RCW 10.77.140, 10.77.150, and 10.77.200. The secretary of the department of social and health services shall retain legal custody of any person placed under this section and review any placement outside of a department mental health hospital every three months, or sooner if warranted by the person's mental health status, to determine if the placement remains appropriate.

(2) Beginning December 1, 2010, and every six months thereafter, the secretary shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use of the authority under this section to transfer persons to a secure facility. The report shall include information related to the number of persons who have been placed in a secure facility operated by the secretary or the secretary of the department of corrections, and the length of time that each such person has been in the secure facility.

[ 2015 c 253 s 1; 2010 c 263 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: "Section 1, chapter 253, Laws of 2015 is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2015." [ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 20.]